Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.240

Construction of RCW references to juvenile delinquents or juvenile delinquency.

All references to juvenile delinquents or juvenile delinquency in other chapters of the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed as meaning juvenile offenders or the commitment of an offense by juveniles as defined by this chapter.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 291 s 78.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 291: See notes following RCW 13.04.005.